Missouri, session 2026, HB2223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 226, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 226.034, to read as follows:
226.034. 1. Any member of the general assembly, county commissioner, or
mayor of a city, town, or village who is dissatisfied with any action or decision included
in the statewide transportation improvement program (STIP) may seek review of such
action or decision by the administrative hearing commission. Such review shall be
sought by the filing of a petition with the administrative hearing commission within
thirty days of the publication date of the annual STIP. If any such petition is sent by
registered mail or certified mail, it shall be deemed filed on the date it is mailed; if it is
sent by any method other than registered mail or certified mail, it shall be deemed filed
on the date it is received by the commission.
2. The procedures applicable to such hearings and determinations shall be those
established by chapter 536.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.